West Virginia, session 2025, HB2326.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Respiratory Care. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on January 26, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-1-26 of this code, modified by the Board of Respiratory Care to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 9, 2024, relating to the Board of Respiratory Care (telehealth practice requirements and definitions, 30 CSR 11), is authorized.